California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(c) If DMSO is prescribed for any purpose other than for those purposes approved pursuant to Section 111550 of the Health and Safety Code, informed consent shall first be obtained from the patient.

As used in this subdivision, “informed consent” means the authorization given by the patient for treatment with DMSO after each of the following conditions have been satisfied:

(1) The patient is informed verbally, in nontechnical terms, about all of the following:

(A) A description of treatment procedures to be used in administering DMSO.

(B) A description of any attendant discomfort and risks to the patient that can be reasonably expected from treatment with DMSO.

(C) An explanation of any benefits to the patient that can be reasonably expected.

(D) An explanation of any appropriate alternative procedures, drugs, or devices that might be advantageous to the patient, and their relative risks and benefits.

(E) An offer to answer any inquiries concerning the treatment of the procedures involved.

(2) The patient signs and dates a written consent form acknowledging that disclosure has been given pursuant to paragraph (1), and acknowledging consent to treatment with DMSO pursuant to this section. The patient shall be provided with a copy of the signed and dated form.

(d) An organized health care system may require that the administration of DMSO within the organized health care system be performed pursuant to standardized procedures developed by the organized health care system through collaboration among administrators and health professionals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Requirements for Licensure [2080. - 2099.]

2080.

(a) Except as otherwise provided, the provisions of this article applicable to applications generally shall apply to all certificates issued.

(b) Every applicant for a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate shall comply with the requirements of this article unless other specific requirements of this chapter are applicable to a particular class of applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.

Each application submitted shall be made upon an electronic online form, or on another form provided by the board, and each application form shall contain a legal verification by the applicant certifying under penalty of perjury that the information provided by the applicant is true and correct and that any information in supporting documents provided by the applicant is true and correct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 8.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2082.

(a) Each application shall include the following:

(1) A diploma issued by an approved medical school. The requirements of the school shall have been at the time of granting the diploma in no degree less than those required under this chapter or by any preceding medical practice act at the time that the diploma was granted. In lieu of a diploma, the applicant may submit evidence satisfactory to the board of having possessed the same.

(2) An official transcript or other official evidence satisfactory to the board showing each approved medical school in which a resident course of professional instruction was pursued covering the minimum requirements for certification as a physician and surgeon, and that a diploma and degree were granted by the school.

(3) Other information concerning the professional instruction and preliminary education of the applicant as the board may require.

(4) Proof of passage of the written examinations as provided under Article 9 (commencing with Section 2170) with a score acceptable to the board.

(5) Proof of satisfactory completion of the postgraduate training required under Section 2096 on a form approved by the board.

(6) An affidavit showing to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant is the person named in each diploma and transcript that they have submitted, that they are the lawful holder thereof, and that the diploma or transcript was procured in the regular course of professional instruction and examination without fraud or misrepresentation.

(7) Either fingerprint cards or a copy of a completed Live Scan form from the applicant.

(8) Beginning January 1, 2020, if the applicant attended a foreign medical school approved by the board pursuant to Section 2084, an official Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates (ECFMG) Certification Status Report submitted by the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates confirming the graduate is ECFMG certified.

(9) Beginning January 1, 2020, if the applicant attended a foreign medical school approved by the board pursuant to Section 2084, official evidence satisfactory to the board of completion of all formal requirements of the medical school for graduation, except the applicant shall not be required to have completed an internship or social service or be admitted or licensed to practice medicine in the country in which the professional instruction was completed.

(b) The Medical Board of California and the Osteopathic Medical Board of California shall submit to
 the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all applicants for the physician’s and surgeon’s certificate, as defined by Section 2050, to determine whether the applicant has a criminal conviction record in this state or in any other jurisdiction, including foreign countries, pursuant to Section 2042. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response in accordance with subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code for the board to determine whether the applicant is subject to denial of licensure under the provisions of Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475) and Section 2221.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 3.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2083.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), each application for a certificate shall be accompanied by the fee required by this chapter and shall be filed with the Division of Licensing.

(b) The license fee shall be waived for a physician and surgeon who certifies to the Medical Board of California that the issuance of the license is for the sole purpose of providing voluntary, unpaid service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 239, Sec. 1.   (SB 1261)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2084.

(a) Medical schools accredited by a national accrediting agency approved by the board and recognized by the United States Department of Education shall be deemed approved by the board.

(b) The board shall determine a foreign medical school to be a recognized medical school if the foreign medical school meets any of the following requirements:

(1) The foreign medical school has been evaluated by the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates (ECFMG) or one of the ECFMG-authorized foreign medical school accreditation agencies and deemed to meet the minimum requirements substantially
 equivalent to the requirements of medical schools accredited by the Liaison Committee on Medical Education, the Committee on Accreditation of Canadian Medical Schools, or the Commission on Osteopathic College Accreditation.

(2) The foreign medical school is listed on the World Federation for Medical Education (WFME) and the Foundation for Advancement of International Medical Education and Research (FAIMER) World Directory of Medical Schools joint directory or the World Directory of Medical Schools.

(3) The foreign medical school had been previously approved by the board. The prior approval shall only be valid for a maximum of seven years from the date of enactment of this section.

(c) This section shall become operative on January
 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 35) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 36.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2084.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a medical school or medical school program accredited by the Liaison Committee on Medical Education, the Committee on Accreditation of Canadian Medical Schools, or the Commission on Osteopathic College Accreditation shall be deemed to meet the requirements of Section 2084.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 37) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 38.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2086.

The Division of Licensing may utilize medical consultants and investigators employed by the board pursuant to Section 2020 to evaluate the curricula of medical schools. A medical consultant or investigator shall meet such reasonable standards of experience and education, to be determined by the division, as will enable him or her to competently perform such duties of evaluation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2087.

If any applicant for licensure is rejected by the board, then the applicant may commence an action in the superior court as provided in Section 2019 against the board to compel it to issue the applicant a certificate or for any other appropriate relief. If the applicant is denied a certificate on the grounds of unprofessional conduct, the provisions of Article 12 (commencing with Section 2220) shall apply. In such an action the court shall proceed under Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the court may not exercise an independent judgment on the evidence. The action shall be speedily determined by the court and shall take precedence over all matters pending therein except criminal cases, applications for
 injunction, or other matters to which special precedence may be given by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 40.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2088.

(a) An applicant for a physician’s and surgeon’s license or a physician’s and surgeon’s licensee who is otherwise eligible for that license but is unable to practice some aspects of medicine safely due to a disability may receive a limited license if he or she does both of the following:

(1) Pays the appropriate initial or renewal license fee.

(2) Signs an agreement on a form prescribed by the board in which the applicant or licensee agrees to limit his or her practice in the manner prescribed by the reviewing physician and agreed to by the board.

(b) The board may require the applicant or
 licensee described in subdivision (a) to obtain an independent clinical evaluation of his or her ability to practice medicine safely as a condition of receiving a limited license under this section.

(c) Any person who knowingly provides false information in the agreement submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be subject to any sanctions available to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 303, Sec. 1.   (AB 2745)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2090.

(a) The board shall not require an applicant for a physician’s and surgeon’s license or a physician’s and surgeon’s postgraduate training license to disclose either of the following:

(1) A condition or disorder that does not impair the applicant’s ability to practice medicine safely.

(2) A condition or disorder for which the applicant is receiving appropriate treatment and which, as a result of the treatment, does not impair the applicant’s ability to practice medicine safely.

(b) This section does not prohibit the board from requiring an applicant to disclose participation in a mental health or substance use
 disorder treatment program, including an impaired practitioner program, resulting from an accusation or disciplinary action brought by a licensing board in or outside of California.

(c) If an applicant discloses that they currently have a condition or disorder that impairs their ability to practice medicine safely, the board shall provide the applicant with information on the availability of a probationary or limited practice license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 952, Sec. 1.   (AB 2164)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2092.

(a) The board shall develop a process to give priority review status to the application of an applicant for a physician and surgeon’s certificate who can demonstrate that they intend to practice in a medically underserved area or serve a medically underserved population as defined in Section 128552 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) An applicant may demonstrate their intent to practice in a medically underserved area or serve a medically underserved population by providing proper documentation, including, but not limited to, a letter from the employer indicating that the applicant has accepted employment and stating the start date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 3.   (SB 1443)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2096.

(a) In addition to other requirements of this chapter, before a physician’s and surgeon’s license may be issued, each applicant, including an applicant applying pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 2105), shall show by evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant has received credit for at least 12 months of board-approved postgraduate training for graduates of medical schools in the United States and Canada or 24 months of board-approved postgraduate training for graduates of foreign medical schools approved by the board pursuant to Section 2084 other than Canadian medical schools, pursuant to the attestation of the program director, designated institutional official, or delegated authority for the approved postgraduate training program where the applicant participated.

(b) The postgraduate training required by this section shall be obtained in a postgraduate training program approved by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education (ACGME) in the United States, the Royal College of Physicians and Surgeons of Canada (RCPSC) in Canada, or the College of Family Physicians of Canada (CFPC) in Canada.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 9.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2097.

(a) In addition to other requirements of this chapter, before a physician’s and surgeon’s license may be renewed, at the time of initial renewal, a physician and surgeon shall show evidence satisfactory to the board that the licensee has received credit for at least 36 months of board-approved postgraduate training, pursuant to the attestation of the program director, designated institutional official, or delegated authority for the approved postgraduate training program where the applicant participated, except licensees or applicants who meet the requirements of Section 2135, 2135.5, 2151, 2428, or by a licensee or applicant using clinical practice in an appointment under Section 2113 as qualifying time to meet the postgraduate training requirements in Section 2065.

(b) A physician’s and surgeon’s certificate shall be automatically placed in delinquent status by the board if the holder of a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate does not show evidence satisfactory to the board that the physician and surgeon has received credit for at least 36 months of board-approved postgraduate training before the licensee’s initial license expiration. The board may grant an additional 60 days to the initial license expiration date authorized under Section 2423.

(c) A licensee who has received credit for at least 24 months of approved postgraduate training in an oral and maxillofacial surgery postgraduate training program after receiving a medical degree from a combined dental and medical degree program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation (CODA), shall show evidence of completion of this training satisfactory to the board at the time of initial renewal, before their physician’s and surgeon’s
 license may be renewed, pursuant to the attestation of the program director, designated institutional official, or delegated authority for the approved postgraduate training program where the licensee participated. 

(d) Upon review of supporting documentation, the board, in its discretion, may renew a physician’s and surgeon’s license to an applicant who has demonstrated substantial compliance with this section.

(e) A physician whose license is canceled or who surrenders their license prior to meeting the renewal requirements under subdivision (a) may not have their license reinstated under Section 2428 without meeting current renewal requirements under subdivision (a), except licenses originally issued under Section 2135, 2135.5, 2151, or licensees that used qualifying time under Section 2113 to meet the postgraduate training requirements in Section 2065. 

(f) This section shall only apply to individuals issued a license by the board on or after January 1, 2022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 10.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2097.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 2097, a physician’s and surgeon’s license may be renewed for the first time if the board receives evidence satisfactory to the board that the licensee is enrolled in a California board-approved postgraduate training program at the time the license expires.

(2) The relevant postgraduate training program director shall report to the board within 30 days, on a form approved by the board, if a licensee who renews their license pursuant to this subdivision is disenrolled from their training program for any reason, including, but not limited to, resignation, termination, or graduation.

(b) If a physician’s and surgeon’s license is initially renewed pursuant to subdivision (a), then, at the time of their second renewal, in addition to any other requirements, the board shall require evidence satisfactory to the board that the licensee has received credit for at least 36 months of board-approved postgraduate training, pursuant to the attestation of the program director, designated institutional official, or delegated authority for the approved postgraduate training program where the applicant participated. A licensee who fails to meet the requirements of this subdivision shall be automatically placed in delinquent status by the board.

(c) If a physician’s and surgeon’s license is initially renewed pursuant to subdivision (a) and the licensee is disenrolled from the
 relevant California board-approved postgraduate training program, the board may place the relevant license in delinquent status if the board does not receive evidence satisfactory to the board that the licensee has received credit for at least 36 months of board-approved postgraduate training. If placed on delinquent status, that license shall be returned to current status upon the board receiving evidence satisfactory to the board that the licensee is enrolled in a California board-approved postgraduate training program or has received credit for at least 36 months of board-approved postgraduate training before their license changes to canceled status, pursuant to Section 2428. Any license status change made pursuant to this subdivision shall not relieve the licensee of the license renewal requirements of subdivision (b).

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the board shall issue an initial physician’s and surgeon’s license for a period of 26 months.

(2) A renewed physician’s and surgeon’s license shall be subject to the requirements of Section 2423.

(e) Upon review of supporting documentation, the board, in its discretion, may renew a physician’s and surgeon’s license for an applicant who has demonstrated substantial compliance with this section.

(f) A physician whose license is canceled or who surrenders their license prior to meeting the renewal requirements of either subdivision (b) or (c) is subject to the reinstatement requirements of subdivision (e) of Section 2097.

(g) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), this section only applies to individuals who are issued an initial physician’s and surgeon’s license by the board on or after January 1, 2022.

(2) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) only applies to individuals who are issued an initial license on or after January 1, 2025.

(h) This section shall not apply to the Osteopathic Medical Board of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 481, Sec. 8.   (SB 1451)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2099.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the Division of Licensing may delegate to any member of the division its authority to approve the admission of candidates to examinations and to approve the issuance of physician’s and surgeon’s certificates to applicants who have met the specific requirements therefor. The division may further delegate to the executive director or other official of the board the authority to approve the admission of candidates to examinations and to approve the issuance of physician’s and surgeon’s certificates to applicants who have met the specific requirements therefor in routine cases to candidates and applicants who clearly meet the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Osteopathic Requirements for Licensure [2099.5. - 2099.6.]

2099.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an originating license for an osteopathic physician’s and surgeon’s certificate issued by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California shall require a written examination that is either prepared or selected by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California. The written examination shall include osteopathic principles and practices and all applicable provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 2080). An applicant shall successfully complete the written examination, as determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 789, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2099.6.

(a) The Osteopathic Medical Board of California shall develop a process to give priority review status to the application of an applicant for an osteopathic physician and surgeon’s certificate who can demonstrate that he or she intends to practice in a medically underserved area or serve a medically underserved population as defined in Section 128565 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) An applicant may demonstrate his or her intent to practice in a medically underserved area or serve a medically underserved population by providing proper documentation, including, but not limited to, a letter from the employer indicating that the applicant has accepted employment and stating the start
 date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 307, Sec. 2.   (AB 1288)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Foreign Medical Graduates [2105. - 2113.]

2105.

(a) No hospital licensed by this state, or operated by the state or a political subdivision thereof, or which receives state financial assistance, directly or indirectly, shall require an individual who at the time of his or her enrollment in a medical school outside the United States is a citizen of the United States, to satisfy any requirements other than those contained in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 2065 prior to commencing the postgraduate training which are not required for graduates of approved medical schools located in the United States or Canada.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 55) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 56.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2111.

(a) Physicians who are not citizens but who meet the requirements of subdivision (b) and who seek postgraduate study in an approved medical school or academic medical center may, after receipt of an appointment from the dean of the California medical school, or dean or chief medical officer of an academic medical center, and application to and approval by the board, be permitted to participate in the professional activities of the department or division in the medical school or academic medical center to which they are appointed. The physician shall be under the direction of the head of the department to which the physician is appointed, supervised by the medical center staff of the medical school or academic medical center, and known for these purposes as a “visiting fellow.” The visiting fellow shall wear a visible name tag
 containing the title “visiting fellow” when the visiting fellow provides clinical services.

(b) (1) Application for approval shall be made on a form prescribed by the division and shall be accompanied by a fee fixed by the board in an amount necessary to recover the actual application processing costs of the program. The application shall show that the person does not immediately qualify for a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate under this chapter and that the person has completed at least three years of postgraduate basic residency requirements. The application shall include a written statement of the recruitment procedures followed by the medical school or academic medical center before offering the appointment to the applicant.

(2) The board shall submit to the Department
 of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all applicants for Section 2111 permits, as defined by this section, to determine whether the applicant has a criminal conviction record in this state or in any other jurisdiction, including foreign countries, pursuant to Section 2042. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response in accordance with subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code for the board to determine whether the applicant is subject to denial of licensure under the provisions of Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(3) Approval shall be granted only for appointment to one medical school or academic medical center, and a physician shall not be granted more than one approval for the same period of time.

(4) Approval may be granted for a maximum of three years and shall be renewed annually. The medical school or academic medical center shall submit a request for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, which shall be accompanied by a renewal fee fixed by the board in an amount necessary to recover the actual application processing costs of the program.

(c) Except to the extent authorized by this section, the visiting fellow may not engage in the practice of medicine. The visiting fellow or the medical school or academic medical center shall not assess any charge for the medical services provided by the visiting fellow, and the visiting
 fellow shall not receive any other compensation therefor.

(d) The time spent under appointment in a medical school or academic medical center pursuant to this section shall not be used to meet the requirements for licensure.

(e) (1) The board shall notify both the visiting fellow and the dean of the appointing medical school or the dean or chief medical officer of the academic medical center of any complaint made about the visiting fellow.

(2) The board may terminate its approval of an appointment for any act that would be grounds for discipline if done by a licensee. The board shall provide both the visiting fellow and the dean of the medical school or dean or chief medical officer of the academic medical center with a written notice of termination including the basis for that termination. The
 visiting fellow may, within 30 days after the date of the notice of termination, file a written appeal to the board. The appeal shall include any documentation the visiting fellow wishes to present to the board.

(f) This section shall not preclude any United States citizen who has received a medical degree from a medical school located in a foreign country and recognized by the board from participating in any program established pursuant to this section.

(g) A visiting fellow approved pursuant to this section before January 1, 2021, who participates in the professional activities of the department or division in an academic medical center shall be deemed to be appointed to that academic medical center as though the initial application had been sponsored by the academic medical center.

(h) As used in this section,
 “academic medical center” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 2168.

(i) The permit authorized by this section may be canceled in any of the following circumstances:

(1) Upon request by the permit holder.

(2) Upon request by an authorized representative of the sponsoring facility or institution.

(3) By the board after the permit has expired and is no longer eligible for renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 4.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2112.

(a) Physicians who are not citizens and who seek postgraduate study, may, after application to and approval by the board, be permitted to participate in a fellowship program in a specialty or subspecialty field, providing the fellowship program is given in a hospital in this state which is approved by the Joint Commission and providing the service is satisfactory to the board. Such physicians shall at all times be under the direction and supervision of a licensed, board-certified physician and surgeon who is recognized as a clearly outstanding specialist in the field in which the foreign fellow is to be trained. The supervisor, as part of the application process, shall submit the supervisor’s curriculum vitae and a protocol of the fellowship program to be completed by the foreign fellow. Approval of the program and supervisor
 is for a period of one year, but may be renewed annually upon application to and approval by the board. The approval may not be renewed more than four times. The board may determine a fee, based on the cost of operating this program, which shall be paid by the applicant at the time the application is filed.

(b) The board shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all applicants for Section 2112 permits, as defined by this section, to determine whether the applicant has a criminal conviction record in this state or in any other jurisdiction, including foreign countries, pursuant to Section 2042. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response in accordance with subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code for the board to determine whether the
 applicant is subject to denial of licensure under the provisions of Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(c) Except to the extent authorized by this section, no such visiting physician may engage in the practice of medicine or receive compensation therefor. The time spent under appointment in a medical school pursuant to this section may not be used to meet the requirements for licensure.

(d) Nothing in this section shall preclude any United States citizen who has received their medical degree from a medical school located in a foreign country from participating in any program established pursuant to this section.

(e) The permit authorized by this section may be canceled in the following circumstances:

(1) Upon request by the permit holder.

(2) Upon request by an authorized representative of the sponsoring facility or institution.

(3) By the board after the permit has expired and is no longer eligible for renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 5.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2113.

(a) Any person who does not immediately qualify for a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate under this chapter and who is offered by the dean of an approved medical school, or dean or chief medical officer of an academic medical center, in this state a full-time faculty position may, after application to and approval by the board, be granted a certificate of registration to engage in the practice of medicine only to the extent that the practice is incident to and a necessary part of that person’s duties as approved by the board in connection with the faculty position. A certificate of registration does not authorize a registrant to admit patients to a nursing or a skilled or assisted living facility unless that facility is formally affiliated with the sponsoring medical school. A clinical fellowship shall not be submitted as a
 faculty service appointment.

(b) Application for a certificate of registration shall be made on a form prescribed by the board and shall be accompanied by a registration fee fixed by the board in an amount necessary to recover the actual application processing costs of the program. To qualify for the certificate, an applicant shall submit all of the following:

(1) If the applicant is a graduate of a medical school other than in the United States or Canada, documentary evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant has been licensed to practice medicine and surgery for not less than four years in another state or country whose requirements for licensure are satisfactory to the board, or has been engaged in the practice of medicine in the United States for at least four years in approved facilities, or has completed a combination of that licensure and training.

(2) If the applicant is a graduate of a medical school in the United States or Canada, documentary evidence that the medical school is approved by the board.

(3) Written certification by the head of the department in which the applicant is to be appointed of all of the following:

(A) The applicant will be under the head of the department’s direction.

(B) The applicant will not be permitted to practice medicine unless incident to and a necessary part of the applicant’s duties as approved by the board in subdivision (a).

(C) The applicant will be accountable to the medical school’s or academic medical center’s chair or division chief for the specialty in which the applicant will practice.

(D) The applicant will be proctored in the same manner as other new faculty members, including, as appropriate, review by the medical staff of the sponsoring medical school or academic medical center.

(E) The applicant will not be appointed to a supervisory position at the level of a medical school or academic medical center’s department chair or division chief.

(4) Demonstration by the dean of the medical school, or dean or chief medical officer or an academic medical center, that the applicant has the requisite qualifications to assume the position to which the applicant is to be appointed and that shall include a written statement of the recruitment procedures followed by the medical school or academic medical center before offering the faculty position to the applicant.

(5) The board shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all applicants for Section 2113 registration, as defined by this section, to determine whether the applicant has a criminal conviction record in this state or in any other jurisdiction, including foreign countries, pursuant to Section 2042. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response in accordance with subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code for the board to determine whether the applicant is subject to denial of licensure under the provisions of Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(c) A certificate of registration shall be issued only for a faculty position at one approved medical school, or academic medical center, and a person shall not be issued more than one
 certificate of registration for the same period of time.

(d) (1) A certificate of registration is valid for one year from its date of issuance and may be renewed twice.

A request for renewal shall be submitted on a form prescribed by the board and shall be accompanied by a renewal fee fixed by the board in an amount necessary to recover the actual application processing costs of the program.

(2) The dean of the medical school, or the dean or chief medical officer of an academic medical center, may request renewal of the registration by submitting a plan at the beginning of the third year of the registrant’s appointment demonstrating the registrant’s continued progress toward licensure and, if the registrant is a graduate of a medical school other than in the United States or Canada, that the registrant has been
 issued a certificate by the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates. The board may, in its discretion, extend the registration for a two-year period to facilitate the registrant’s completion of the licensure process.

(e) If the registrant is a graduate of a medical school other than in the United States or Canada, the registrant shall meet the requirements of Section 2065 or 2135, as appropriate, in order to obtain a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may accept clinical practice in an appointment pursuant to this section as qualifying time to meet the postgraduate training requirements in Section 2065, and, in its discretion, waive the examination and the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates certification requirements specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 2065 in the event the registrant applies for a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate.
 As a condition to waiving any examination or the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates certification requirement, the board in its discretion, may require an applicant to pass a clinical competency examination approved by the board. The board shall not waive any examination for an applicant who has not completed at least one year in the faculty position.

(f) Except to the extent authorized by this section, the registrant shall not engage in the practice of medicine, bill individually for medical services provided by the registrant, or receive compensation therefor, unless the registrant is issued a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate.

(g) When providing clinical services, the registrant shall wear a visible name tag containing the title “visiting professor” or “visiting faculty member,” as appropriate, and the institution at which the services are provided shall
 obtain a signed statement from each patient to whom the registrant provides services acknowledging that the patient understands that the services are provided by a person who does not hold a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate but who is qualified to participate in a special program as a visiting professor or faculty member.
